Utah statutes.
76-7-330.   Contingent continuance of prior law.

(1)  If the implementation of Section 76-7-326 enacted by this bill is stayed or otherwise ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction to not be implemented, beginning on the day on which the implementation of Section 76-7-326 is stayed or otherwise ordered not to be implemented the statutes listed in Subsection (2) shall:

(a)  be given effect as if this bill did not amend those statutes; and

(b)  remain in effect as if not amended by this bill until the day on which a court orders that Section 76-7-326 may be implemented.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies to:

(a)  Section 76-7-301;

(b)  Section 76-7-310.5; and

(c)  Section 76-7-314.

(3)  Nothing in this section prevents the Legislature from amending, repealing, or taking any other action regarding the sections listed in Subsection (2) in this or a subsequent session.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 2004 General Session

